src/fst/morphology/stems/adverbs.lexc
LEXICON н
+Adv: # ;

LEXICON н_Interr/Rel
+Adv+Interr: # ;
+Adv+Rel: # ;

LEXICON Adverb ! TODO FIX CHECK Some of these are probably missing ё's
втридорога:втри́дорога н ;
когда:когда́ н_Interr/Rel ;
куда:куда́ н_Interr/Rel "weight: 5.779970223639792" ;
докуда:доку́да н_Interr/Rel ;
покуда:поку́да н_Interr/Rel "weight: 4.106045447236205" ;
откуда:отку́да н_Interr/Rel "weight: 5.423756095622383" ;
ниоткуда:ниотку́да н "weight: 3.735626770140171" ;
издалека:издалека́ н "weight: 4.342172156212365" ;
дома:до́ма н ;
сглупа:сглупа́ н ;
досыта:до́сы́та н "weight: 3.52691970568769" ;
насупротив:насупроти́в н ;
вслед:всле́д н ;
наизготове:наизгото́ве н ;
где:где́ н_Interr/Rel "weight: 6.167041956470704" ;
вдалеке:вдалеке́ н "weight: 3.9033737220090794" ;
факсимиле:факси́миле н ;
доколе:доко́ле н_Interr/Rel "weight: 3.184168788029196" ;
отколе:отко́ле н_Interr/Rel ;
крайне:кра́йне н "weight: 4.59143505081183" ;
внешне:вне́шне н "weight: 4.318681434826133" ;
навыкате:навы́кате н "weight: 3.353474850572648" ;
нынче:ны́нче н "weight: 4.5989209442274" ;
вотще:вотще́ н ;
понимающе:понима́юще н "weight: 3.900112915629791" ;
отрезвляюще:отрезвля́юще н ;
враз:вра́з н "weight: 4.008636136670301" ;
кпереди:кпе́реди н ;
напрямки:напрямки́ н ;
по-каковски:по-како́вски н_Interr/Rel ;
адски:а́дски н ;
нервически:нерви́чески н ;
морфологически:мо̀рфологи́чески н ;
комически:коми́чески н ;
технически:техни́чески н "weight: 3.4290815148317226" ;
прагматически:прагмати́чески н ;
фонетически:фонети́чески н ;
скептически:скепти́чески н "weight: 3.7152382493545817" ;
графически:графи́чески н ;
по-мальчишески:по-мальчи́шески н ;
хозяйски:хозя́йски н "weight: 3.7152382493545817" ;
по-украински:по̀-укра́и́нски н ;
наискоски:наискоски́ н ;
антисоветски:а̀нтисове́тски н ;
издевательски:издева́тельски н ;
по-мужицки:по̀-мужи́цки н ;
по-аглицки:по-аглицки н ; 		! TODO stress (from снятник)
урывками:уры́вками н "weight: 3.1668087093714035" ;
априори:априо́ри н ;
выпивши:вы́пивши н ;
по-свинячьи:по-свиня́чьи н ;
обыдёнкой:обыдёнкой н ;
шаляй-валяй:шаля̀й-валя́й н ;
как:ка́к н_Interr/Rel ;
ва-банк:ва-ба́нк н ;
эк:э́к н "weight: 3.605645299930166" ;
запоем:запо́ем н ;
зачем:заче́м н_Interr/Rel "weight: 5.5669964092251405" ;
почём:почём н_Interr/Rel ;
самоплавом:самопла́вом н ;
мимоездом:мимое́здом н ;
шажком:шажко́м н ;
волоком:во́локом н ;
торчком:торчко́м н ;
пешедралом:пешедра́лом н ;
всемером:всемеро́м н ;
налётом:налётом н ;
телешом:телешо́м н ;
где-либо:где́-либо н ;
величаво:велича́во н "weight: 3.200861521635764" ;
заживо:за́живо н "weight: 3.5709835812631594" ;
стыдливо:стыдли́во н "weight: 3.694721474346611" ;
неторопливо:неторопли́во н ;
сиротливо:сиротли́во н ;
неряшливо:неря́шливо н ;
находчиво:нахо́дчиво н ;
уклончиво:укло́нчиво н "weight: 3.754338465293661" ;
каково:каково́ н_Interr/Rel ;
неласково:нела́сково н ;
перво-наперво:пѐрво-на́перво н ;
чего:чего́ н_Interr/Rel ;
отчего:отчего́ н_Interr/Rel "weight: 4.835971732414691" ;
намного:намно́го н "weight: 4.278828351458204" ;
чуждо:чу́ждо н ;
свежо:свежо́ н "weight: 3.7051010062977605" ;
мягко:мя́гко н "weight: 4.683001884256742" ;
низко:ни́зко н "weight: 4.41228615077019" ;
негромко:негро́мко н "weight: 4.616566225615304" ;
хрупко:хру́пко н ;
коротко:ко́ротко н "weight: 4.669019537653377" ;
насколько:наско́лько н_Interr/Rel "weight: 4.73633606308446" ;
маленько:мале́нько н "weight: 4.164414058289993" ;
тоненько:то́ненько н ;
далеконько:далеко́нько н ;
округло:окру́гло н ;
весело:ве́село н "weight: 4.9342439165435605" ;
кисло:ки́сло н "weight: 3.643691606541016" ;
семо:се́мо н ;
неопровержимо:нѐопровержи́мо н ;
нестерпимо:нестерпи́мо н "weight: 3.9505301258477292" ;
невозвратимо:нѐвозврати́мо н ;
пиано:пиа́но н ;
дробно:дро́бно н "weight: 3.184168788029196" ;
исправно:испра́вно н "weight: 3.9161774961630575" ;
негативно:негати́вно н ;
директивно:директи́вно н ;
многословно:мно̀госло́вно н ;
надрывно:надры́вно н "weight: 3.184168788029196" ;
надсадно:надса́дно н "weight: 3.4092714818765204" ;
безвозмездно:безвозме́здно н "weight: 3.3648483817939754" ;
ежегодно:ѐжего́дно н "weight: 3.89296270662479" ;
немилосердно:немилосе́рдно н ;
безлюдно:безлю́дно н ;
надежно:наде́жно н "weight: 3.8690229586109983" ;
несложно:несло́жно н "weight: 3.62457083534347" ;
образно:о́бразно н "weight: 3.5421098682728367" ;
бесполезно:бесполе́зно н "weight: 4.281556739183708" ;
грузно:гру́зно н "weight: 3.7152382493545817" ;
елейно:еле́йно н ;
нестройно:нестро́йно н "weight: 3.0859244446606486" ;
гостеприимно:го̀степрии́мно н ;
безумно:безу́мно н "weight: 4.066993282400681" ;
рискованно:риско́ванно н ;
нежданно-негаданно:нежда̀нно-нега́данно н ;
осознанно:осо́знанно н "weight: 3.278164074126468" ;
дерзновенно:дерзнове́нно н ;
непосредственно:непосре́дственно н "weight: 4.470736596826336" ;
существенно:суще́ственно н "weight: 4.078358855309672" ;
соответственно:соотве́тственно н "weight: 4.447704248811209" ;
поражённо:поражённо н ;
обособленно:обосо́бленно н ;
умиленно:умиле́нно н "weight: 3.0640448756318226" ;
промышленно:промы́шленно н ;
всенепременно:всенепреме́нно н "weight: 3.0640448756318226" ;
безжизненно:безжи́зненно н ;
целомудренно:целому́дренно н ;
обостренно:обостре́нно н ;
ожесточенно:ожесточе́нно н ;
напыщенно:напы́щенно н ;
организационно:организацио́нно н ;
законно:зако́нно н "weight: 3.71019920492427" ;
пустынно:пусты́нно н "weight: 3.5421098682728367" ;
купно:ку́пно н ;
попарно:попа́рно н "weight: 3.2324373153488297" ;
чрезмерно:чрезме́рно н "weight: 3.730820106903394" ;
жирно:жи́рно н "weight: 3.317449871298853" ;
чопорно:чо́порно н ;
литературно:литерату́рно н ;
согласно:согла́сно н "weight: 4.676386691946265" ;
неинтересно:неинтере́сно н "weight: 4.073628808108347" ;
ясно:я́сно н "weight: 5.265250688200531" ;
аккуратно:аккура́тно н "weight: 4.6852443947671345" ;
неприметно:неприме́тно н ;
эксплицитно:эксплици́тно н ;
перманентно:пермане́нтно н ;
нестандартно:нестанда́ртно н ;
безучастно:безуча́стно н "weight: 3.4676599491383264" ;
благостно:бла́гостно н "weight: 3.041004272364715" ;
грустно:гру́стно н "weight: 4.5907682937318075" ;
нелицеприятно:нѐлицеприя́тно н ;
однозначно:однозна́чно н "weight: 3.8194147977010124" ;
внутримышечно:внутримы́шечно н ;
неприлично:неприли́чно н "weight: 3.8504661974016217" ;
лаконично:лакони́чно н "weight: 3.353474850572648" ;
демократично:демократи́чно н ;
пессимистично:пессимисти́чно н ;
непорядочно:непоря́дочно н ;
недостаточно:недоста́точно н "weight: 4.351725525884485" ;
неотлучно:неотлу́чно н ;
неспешно:неспе́шно н "weight: 3.768600539255188" ;
великодушно:великоду́шно н ;
еженощно:ежено́щно н ;
гениально:гениа́льно н "weight: 3.6999422481187483" ;
вертикально:вертика́льно н "weight: 3.6999422481187483" ;
номинально:номина́льно н ;
спирально:спира́льно н ;
документально:документа́льно н ;
концептуально:концептуа́льно н ;
раздельно:разде́льно н "weight: 3.6183535117926313" ;
содержательно:содержа́тельно н ;
губительно:губи́тельно н ;
медлительно:медли́тельно н ;
удовлетворительно:удовлетвори́тельно н ;
разрушительно:разруши́тельно н ;
самопроизвольно:са̀мопроизво́льно н ;
мудро:му́дро н "weight: 3.612045887250756" ;
где-то:где́-то н ;
трудновато:труднова́то н "weight: 3.4764302975773074" ;
ядовито:ядови́то н "weight: 3.7497355784718573" ;
густо:гу́сто н "weight: 4.451552190383572" ;
скрыто:скры́то н ;
горячо:горячо́ н "weight: 4.286962624853529" ;
влёт:влёт н ;
помногу:помно́гу н "weight: 3.216936323825264" ;
неподалёку:неподалёку н ;
всухомятку:всухомя́тку н "weight: 3.1298569142430335" ;
долу:до́лу н ;
почему:почему́ н_Interr/Rel "weight: 5.897426221473829" ;
наполовину:наполови́ну н "weight: 4.3263130592598795" ;
наспех:на́спех н "weight: 3.8613373970073566" ;
внаймы:внаймы́ н ;
досель:досе́ль н ;
доколь:доко́ль н_Interr/Rel ;
сколь:ско́ль н_Interr/Rel "weight: 4.17699367781132" ;
отколь:отко́ль н_Interr/Rel ;
крадучись:кра́дучись н "weight: 3.4850270336731057" ;
сплошь:спло́шь н "weight: 4.277228840207288" ;
втихую:втиху́ю н "weight: 3.184168788029196" ;
плашмя:плашмя́ н "weight: 3.605645299930166" ;
немножечко:немно́жечко н "weight: 3.5991489685887923" ;
сколечко:ско́лечко н_Interr/Rel ;
сколько:ско́лько н_Interr/Rel ;
